Nevada, session 83, SB373.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In a county whose population is 700,000 or more the board
of county commissioners shall adopt an ordinance for the
establishment of a multi-jurisdictional business license within the
county and each incorporated city located in the county, which
must, without limitation:
(a) Establish a system for issuing a multi-jurisdictional
business license for categories of businesses set forth in the
ordinance to engage in such business within the county;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) Include the requirements for obtaining the multi-
jurisdictional business license;
(c) Include a revenue-sharing structure for participating
jurisdictions; and
(d) Include any other requirement necessary to establish the
system for issuing the multi-jurisdictional business license.
2. The board of county commissioners shall cooperate with
the governing body of each incorporated city in the county to enter
into an agreement in accordance with the provisions of NRS
277.080 to 277.180, inclusive, to establish a multi-jurisdictional
business license as agreed to by all the participating jurisdictions
for any specified category of business in accordance with the
ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 1 or section 2 of this
act, as applicable. An agreement entered into pursuant to this
subsection must set forth the purposes, powers, rights, obligations
and responsibilities, financial and otherwise, of the county and
each incorporated city that enters into the agreement.
3. In entering into an agreement pursuant to subsection 2 to
establish a multi-jurisdictional business license for a specified
category of business, the board of county commissioners and
governing bodies shall consider whether the existing requirements
of the county or incorporated city for any business that falls within
the proposed category:
(a) Provide for the same or substantially similar fees for an
application for or an application to renew the existing license for
that business;
(b) Establish the same or substantially similar renewal periods
for the existing license for that business; and
(c) Regulate the business in the same or a substantially similar
manner with respect to any time, place or manner requirements.
4. Upon entering into an agreement pursuant to subsection 2
to create a multi-jurisdictional business license:
(a) The board of county commissioners shall establish by
ordinance a system for issuing such a multi-jurisdictional business
license that authorizes a person that operates a business in the
specified category of business to engage in that business within the
county and each incorporated city located in the county in which
the person intends to conduct business;
(b) The issuance of the multi-jurisdictional business license
must comply with the requirements of NRS 244.33506, 244.33507
and 244.33508; and
(c) The board of county commissioners and each governing
body of an incorporated city located in the county shall integrate
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
the application for the multi-jurisdictional business license with
the state business portal pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3
of NRS 75A.100.
Sec. 2. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each governing body of an incorporated city in a county
whose population is 700,000 or more shall adopt an ordinance for
the establishment of a multi-jurisdictional business license within
the county and each incorporated city located in the county, which
must, without limitation:
(a) Establish a system for issuing a multi-jurisdictional
business license for categories of businesses set forth in the
ordinance to engage in such business within the county;
(b) Include the requirements for obtaining the multi-
jurisdictional business license;
(c) Include a revenue-sharing structure for participating
jurisdictions; and
(d) Include any other requirement necessary to establish the
system for issuing the multi-jurisdictional business license.
2. Each governing body of an incorporated city shall
cooperate with each other governing body of an incorporated city
and board of county commissioners in the county to enter into an
agreement in accordance with the provisions of NRS 277.080 to
277.180, inclusive, to establish a multi-jurisdictional business
license as agreed to by all the participating jurisdictions for any
specified category of business in accordance with the ordinance
adopted pursuant to subsection 1 or section 1 of this act, as
applicable. An agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection
must set forth the purposes, powers, rights, obligations and
responsibilities, financial and otherwise, of the county and each
incorporated city that enters into the agreement.
3. In entering into an agreement pursuant to subsection 2 to
establish a multi-jurisdictional business license for a specified
category of business, the governing bodies and board of county
commissioners shall consider whether the existing requirements of
the incorporated city or county for any business that falls within
the proposed category:
(a) Provide for the same or substantially similar fees for an
application for or an application to renew the existing license for
that business;
(b) Establish the same or substantially similar renewal periods
for the existing license for that business; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(c) Regulate the business in the same or a substantially similar
manner with respect to any time, place or manner requirements.
4. Upon entering into an agreement pursuant to subsection 2
to create a multi-jurisdictional business license:
(a) The governing body shall establish by ordinance a system
for issuing such a multi-jurisdictional business license that
authorizes a person that operates a business in the specified
category of business to engage in that business within the county
and each incorporated city located in the county in which the
person intends to conduct business;
(b) The issuance of the multi-jurisdictional business license
must comply with the requirements of NRS 266.358, 266.362 and
266.368; and
(c) The governing body and each other governing body of an
incorporated city located in the county and board of county
commissioners shall integrate the application for the multi-
jurisdictional business license with the state business portal
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3 of NRS 75A.100.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)